Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1 Water Quality Control Act
69-3-108. Permits.

Every person who is or is planning to carry on any of the activities outlined in subsection (b), other than a person who discharges into a publicly owned treatment works or who is a domestic discharger into a privately owned treatment works, or who is regulated under a general permit as described in subsection (l ), shall file an application for a permit with the commissioner or, when necessary, for modification of such person's existing permit.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a person who discharges into a publicly owned treatment works or a person who is a domestic discharger into a privately owned treatment works, to carry out any of the following activities, except in accordance with the conditions of a valid permit:

The alteration of the physical, chemical, radiological, biological, or bacteriological properties of any waters of the state;

The construction, installation, modification, or operation of any treatment works, or part thereof, or any extension or addition thereto;

The increase in volume or strength of any wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified under any existing permit;

The development of a natural resource or the construction, installation, or operation of any establishment or any extension or modification thereof or addition thereto, the operation of which will or is likely to cause an increase in the discharge of wastes into the waters of the state or would otherwise alter the physical, chemical, radiological, biological or bacteriological properties of any waters of the state in any manner not already lawfully authorized;

The construction or use of any new outlet for the discharge of any wastes into the waters of the state;

The discharge of sewage, industrial wastes or other wastes into waters, or a location from which it is likely that the discharged substance will move into waters;

The construction, installation, or operation of a liquid waste management system supporting an animal feeding operation that stables or confines as many as, or more than, the numbers of animals specified by federal law defining a large concentrated animal feeding operation;

A state operating permit issued pursuant to this subdivision (b)(7) shall be enforceable only in regards to submission and maintenance of a current approved nutrient management plan;

Animal feeding operations that are not required under this subdivision (b)(7) to have a permit may apply for and be issued a state operating permit. An animal feeding operation issued a state operating permit pursuant to this subdivision (b)(7) is required to conduct such operations in accordance with the permit;

The discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes into a well or a location where it is likely that the discharged substance will move into a well, or the underground placement of fluids and other substances that do or may affect the waters of the state;

The diversion of water through a flume for the purpose of generation of electric power by a utility; or

Animal feeding operations that are required under the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), to have a permit for concentrated animal feeding operations. Such operations must be conducted in accordance with the conditions of a valid national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit;

Animal feeding operations that are not required under the federal Clean Water Act to have a permit for concentrated animal feeding operations may apply for and, if eligible under federal law, be issued a NPDES permit. An animal feeding operation issued a NPDES permit pursuant to this subdivision (b)(10)(B) is required to conduct such operations in accordance with the permit.

Any person operating or planning to operate a sewerage system shall file an application with the commissioner for a permit or, when necessary, for modification of such person's existing permit. Unless a person holds a valid permit, it is unlawful to operate a sewerage system.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any person discharging into a septic tank connected only to a subsurface drainfield, or any person constructing or operating a sanitary landfill between March 25, 1980, and March 24, 1982, except in a county having a population of not less than sixty thousand two hundred fifty (60,250) nor more than sixty thousand three hundred fifty (60,350), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, as defined and regulated by §§ 68-211-101 — 68-211-115, to secure a permit; provided, that the exemption provided in this subsection (d) shall not exempt such person from any other provision of this part; and provided further, that any such person who is exempt from obtaining a permit for constructing or operating a sanitary landfill between March 25, 1980, and March 24, 1982, shall not thereafter be required to obtain such permit.

Applicants for permits that would authorize a new or expanded wastewater discharge into surface waters shall include in the application consideration of alternatives, including, but not limited to, land application and beneficial reuse of the wastewater.

With regard to permits for activities related to the surface mining of coal:

No permit shall be issued that would allow removal of coal from the earth from its original location by surface mining methods or surface access points to underground mining within one hundred feet (100') of the ordinary high water mark of any stream or allow overburden or waste materials from removal of coal from the earth by surface mining of coal to be disposed of within one hundred feet (100') of the ordinary high water mark of a stream; provided, however, that a permit may be issued or renewed for stream crossings, including, but not limited to, rail crossings, utilities crossings, pipeline crossings, minor road crossings, for operations to improve the quality of stream segments previously disturbed by mining and for activities related to and incidental to the removal of coal from its original location, such as transportation, storage, coal preparation and processing, loading and shipping operations within one hundred feet (100') of the ordinary high water mark of a stream if necessary due to site specific conditions that do not cause the loss of stream function and do not cause a discharge of pollutants in violation of water quality criteria. Nothing in this subdivision (f)(1) shall apply to placement of material from coal preparation and processing plants;

Without limiting the applicability of this section, if the commissioner determines that surface coal mining at a particular site will violate water quality standards because acid mine drainage from the site will not be amenable to treatment with proven technology both during the permit period or subsequent to completion of mining activities, the permit shall be denied.

The commissioner may grant permits authorizing the discharges or activities described in subsection (b), including, but not limited to, land application of wastewater, but in granting such permits shall impose such conditions, including effluent standards and conditions and terms of periodic review, as are necessary to accomplish the purposes of this part, and as are not inconsistent with the regulations promulgated by the board.

Under no circumstances shall the commissioner issue a permit for an activity that would cause a condition of pollution either by itself or in combination with others.

If a permit is required under this part for a public transportation project commissioned by a federal, state, or local government, the alternatives analysis required by Tenn. Comp. R & Regs. 0400-40-07-.04(5) does not need to include alternative road locations but must include other measures to avoid and minimize impacts to resource values.

In addition, the permits shall include:

The most stringent effluent limitations and schedules of compliance, either promulgated by the board, required to implement any applicable water quality standards, necessary to comply with an area-wide waste treatment plan, or necessary to comply with other state or federal laws or regulations;

A definite term, not to exceed five (5) years, for which the permit is valid. This term is subject to provisions for modification, revocation, or suspension of the permit;

Monitoring, recording, reporting, and inspection requirements; and

In the case of permits authorizing discharges from publicly owned treatment works, terms and conditions requiring the permittee to enforce user and cost recovery charges, pretreatment standards, and toxic effluent limitations applicable to industrial users discharging into the treatment works.

The commissioner may revoke, suspend, or modify any permit for cause, including:

Violation of any terms or conditions of the permit or of any provision of this part;

Obtaining the permit by misrepresentation or failing to disclose fully all relevant facts; or

A change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted discharge.

No permit under subsection (g) or (h) for the construction of any new outlet or for construction activities involved in the development of natural resources, for the construction of a new waste treatment system or for the modification or extension of an existing waste treatment system shall be issued by the commissioner until the plans have first been submitted to and approved by the commissioner. No such approval shall be construed as creating a presumption of correct operation nor as warranting by the commissioner that the approved facilities will reach the designated goals. If an environmental impact statement is required for any permit, the commissioner may require the applicant to pay for its preparation. Any such impact statement must also include and address economic and social impact.

Any permit procedure or other action required by or undertaken in accordance with this section or part shall be conducted in accordance with title 13, chapter 18, when the permit or action involves a major energy project, as defined in § 13-18-102.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or circumscribe the authority of the commissioner to issue emergency orders as specified in § 69-3-109.

Where the commissioner finds that a category of activities or discharges would be appropriately regulated under a general permit, the commissioner may issue such a permit. Any person conducting activities in the category covered by a general permit shall not be required to file individual applications for permits except as provided in specific requirements of the general permit. Any person conducting activities covered under a general permit may be required by the commissioner to file an application for any individual permit. Upon the issuance of an individual permit to a person with a general permit, the applicability of the general permit to that permitted activity or discharge shall be terminated. Any person who holds an individual permit for an activity or discharge covered under a general permit may request that the individual permit be revoked. Upon such revocation, the activity or discharge shall become subject to the general permit.

Notwithstanding subsection (g), upon application by a person who discharges into groundwaters of the state and who is subject to a permit issued pursuant to the Hazardous Waste Management Act, compiled in title 68, chapter 212, the commissioner may issue variances from the applicable water quality standards, criteria, or classification for groundwater; provided, that:

The waters to which the variance applies are not used as a current source of drinking water and such use is not reasonably anticipated for the term of the variance and a reasonable time thereafter;

The applicant demonstrates that such discharges will not pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment as defined in Tenn. Comp. R. & Reg. 1200-01-11-.06(6)(e)(2) (reserved) in effect on April 1, 1988, and will not impair any actual, current uses other than those affected by the variance;

Variances will be effective for a specific term, not to exceed the effective term of the permit;

The variance is consistent with the Federal Water Pollution Control Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.); and

The variance provided for under this subsection (m) shall be applied for and issued in accordance with procedures regarding the issuance of permits as required by regulations issued under this chapter.

A chief administrative officer of a county highway department does not violate this chapter by repairing or causing the repair of up to four hundred feet (400') of highway or road in an emergency situation, if immediate repairs are necessary to protect human safety and welfare, and if such repairs comply with rules and regulations promulgated by the board that regulate the manner in which the repairs are made. Such officer need not obtain a permit prior to making such repairs under such circumstances.

As soon as practicable, the chief administrative officer of a county highway department shall notify the commissioner by telephone that an emergency has arisen and that such chief administrative officer intends to make repairs in response to such emergency. The giving of such notice shall not be construed to authorize the commissioner to terminate such repairs.

Within ten (10) days of the completion of any highway or road repair made pursuant to this subsection (n), the chief administrative officer of the county highway department ordering such repair shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of the action taken and the nature of the emergency necessitating such immediate repair.

The following activities do not require a permit under this section:

The removal of downed trees by dragging or winching and without grading or reshaping of the stream channel;

The placement of downed trees on stream banks for erosion protection; and

The planting of vegetation on stream banks.

Unless the applicant agrees otherwise, when an individual landowner applies for a permit for debris removal or stream bank stabilization activities, the commissioner shall either issue or deny the permit or take action scheduling a public hearing on the application within sixty (60) days of receipt of a complete application; provided further, however, that the staff of the division will communicate orally or in writing to the applicant within fifteen (15) days of receipt of any such application.

The alteration of a wet weather conveyance, as defined in § 69-3-103, by any activity is permitted by this subsection (q) and shall require no notice or approval; provided, that it is done in accordance with all of the following conditions:

The activity may not result in the discharge of waste or other substances that may be harmful to humans or wildlife;

Material may not be placed in a location or manner so as to impair surface water flow into or out of any wetland area;

Sediment shall be prevented from entering other waters of the state;

Erosion and sediment controls shall be designed according to the size and slope of disturbed or drainage areas to detain runoff and trap sediment and shall be properly selected, installed, and maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's specifications and good engineering practices;

Erosion and sediment control measures shall be in place and functional before earth moving operations begin, and shall be constructed and maintained throughout the construction period. Temporary measures may be removed at the beginning of the work day, but shall be replaced at the end of the work day;

Checkdams shall be utilized where runoff is concentrated. Clean rock, log, sandbag or straw bale checkdams shall be properly constructed to detain runoff and trap sediment. Checkdams or other erosion control devices are not to be constructed in stream. Clean rock can be of various type and size, depending on the application. Clean rock shall not contain fines, soils or other wastes or contaminants; and

Appropriate steps shall be taken to ensure that petroleum products or other chemical pollutants are prevented from entering waters of the state. All spills shall be reported to the appropriate emergency management agency and to the division. In the event of a spill, measures shall be taken immediately to prevent pollution of waters of the state, including groundwater.

There shall be no additional conditions upon a person's activity within a wet weather conveyance. This subdivision (q)(2) does not apply to national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permits.

A person desiring to alter a specific water of the state may request a determination from the commissioner that it is a wet weather conveyance and submit a report from a qualified hydrologic professional in support of the request. If the report contains all information that is required in rules promulgated by the board, and in accordance with department procedures and guidance, and is certified by a qualified hydrologic professional to be true, accurate and complete and, if submitted after promulgation of the rules required by § 69-3-105(m), contains all information that is required in those rules, then the determination made in the report shall be presumed to be correct, unless the commissioner notifies the person, in writing, within thirty (30) days of submittal of the report, that the commissioner has affirmatively determined that there is a significant question about whether the water of the state in question is a stream or a wet weather conveyance and states the reasons for that determination. In that event, the commissioner must, within thirty (30) days following the initial notification, determine whether the water of the state in question is a stream or a wet weather conveyance and notify the person in writing of that decision and the reasons for that determination. A person may appeal a determination by the commissioner that the specific water is a stream by filing a petition for appeal with the board within thirty (30) days of receiving the commissioner's decision. For purposes of this subsection (r), a qualified hydrologic professional is a person holding a bachelor's degree in biology, geology, ecology, engineering or related sciences, having at least five (5) years of relevant experience in making hydrologic determinations and who has been certified as a hydrologic professional pursuant to rules promulgated by the board.

Any NPDES permit issued pursuant to this section to a local governmental entity administering a municipal separate storm sewer system shall not impose post-construction storm water requirements, except to the extent necessary to comply with the minimum requirements of federal law. Any such NPDES permit that includes numeric or narrative effluent limitations to manage post-construction storm water shall allow the local governmental entity administering a municipal separate storm sewer system discretion in selecting measures to meet any such effluent limitations. These numeric or narrative effluent limitations to manage post-construction stormwater shall be adopted by the board as rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

This state shall not require any local governmental entity that administers a municipal separate storm sewer system under a NPDES permit issued pursuant to this section to impose control measures for post-construction storm water that exceed the minimum requirements of federal law. Any local governmental entity that adopts control measures that exceed the minimum requirements of federal law must do so by ordinance or resolution, as appropriate, by the local legislative body upon a majority vote. This subsection (t) shall not apply to any ordinance or resolution in effect on April 23, 2016, but shall not preclude a local governmental entity that administers a municipal separate storm sewer system from making changes consistent with subsection (s) and this subsection (t). When a local governmental entity seeks coverage under any future version of the NPDES permit after April 23, 2016, such ordinance or resolution shall comply with subsection (s) and this subsection (t). The local government entity shall provide in writing the control measures that exceed federal minimum requirements to the local legislative body at least thirty (30) days in advance of a vote in order to provide for a public comment period.

Notwithstanding any other law, a person who has contracted for the right to store water in a reservoir owned by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers shall have exclusive rights to any return flows generated directly or indirectly to that reservoir by the person. The rights conferred by this subsection (u) shall be subject to any regulatory requirements imposed by the commissioner and to the availability to the person of unused storage capacity within the reservoir to store such return flows.

As used in this subsection (u), “return flow” means water that is discharged directly or indirectly to a reservoir from a water reclamation facility.

Compliance with a NPDES permit issued under this section shall be deemed compliance for purposes of §§ 69-3-109; 69-3-114(a); 69-3-114(b) with respect to this part or any rule, regulation, or standard of water quality promulgated by the board; 69-3-115; 69-3-116; 69-3-117; and 69-3-118(a), except for any standard imposed under Section 307 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act for a toxic pollutant injurious to human health.

Compliance includes the discharge of pollutants for which no standard or limit is set forth in the permit if:

The permit holder complies with applicable reporting and disclosure requirements under this part; and

The discharge of pollutants is disclosed to the department in such a manner that the discharge is within the reasonable contemplation of the department at the time of issuance of the final permit.

Watershed activities conducted in accordance with a site-specific design developed through full application of the Natural Resource Conservation Service (NRCS) Conservation Practice Standard 580 (Tennessee) and NRCS Engineering Field Handbook, Chapter 16 Streambank and Shoreline Protection, and subject to NRCS oversight as a federal action, do not result in pollution and do not require compensatory mitigation. Such watershed activities shall be regulated under a general permit for aquatic alterations pursuant to subsection (l ). The commissioner shall draft an initial general permit authorizing such watershed activities, conduct public notice in accordance with the board's rules, and issue the initial general permit no later than December 31, 2020. Thereafter, the commissioner shall ensure timely renewal of the general permit.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 7; 1971, ch. 386, § 2; 1973, ch. 105, § 1; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1980, ch. 647, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 131, § 43; T.C.A., § 70-330; Acts 1983, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 804, § 6; 1988, ch. 688, §§ 3, 7; 1989, ch. 114, § 1; 1993, ch. 155, § 1; 1998, ch. 659, § 4; 1998, ch. 735, § 2; 2004, ch. 519, § 1; 2009, ch. 271, § 1; 2009, ch. 289, § 2; 2009, ch. 330, § 1; 2009, ch. 464, §§ 2, 5; 2016, ch. 1007, § 1; 2017, ch. 220, § 1; 2017, ch. 293, § 2; 2018, ch. 496, § 1; 2018, ch. 523, §§ 2, 3; 2018, ch. 845, § 1; 2019, ch. 110, § 1; 2020, ch. 589, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Tenn. Comp. R. & Reg. 1200-01-11-.06(6)(e)(2), referred to in this section, is reserved.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2009, ch. 289, § 1 provided that the act, which added subsection (f), shall be known and may be cited as “The Responsible Mining Act of 2009.”

Acts 2018, ch. 496, § 2 provided that no NPDES permit regulating a local government entity's municipal separate storm sewer system shall be issued pursuant to this section, until after the rules required by subsection (s) take effect.

Acts 2018, ch. 523, § 3, which amended Acts 2017, ch. 293, §§ 3-5, changed the effective date in ch. 293 from March 1, 2018 to July 1, 2018. This amendment results in the amendment to this section by Acts 2018, ch. 523 taking effect on July 1, 2018.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (g), redesignated the former first sentence as (1), redesignated the former second sentence as (2), added (3), redesignated the former introductory language at the end and former (1)-(4) as the present introductory language of (4) and (4)(A)-(D) respectively; and substituted “This term is subject to” for “This term shall be subject to” at the beginning of the last sentence of present (4)(B).

The 2020 amendment added (w).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 110, § 2. April 11, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 589, § 2. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalties for violations of title 69, ch. 3, part 1, §69-3-115.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Water Law, You Never Miss the Water Till the Well Runs Dry (Vincent A. Sikora), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1988).

Attorney General Opinions. County zoning authority to regulate concentrated animal feeding operations, OAG 99-071, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 71 (3/22/99).

69-3-109. Complaints — Orders for corrective action.

Whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this part or regulation promulgated thereunder or orders issued pursuant thereto has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur, the commissioner may cause a written complaint to be served upon the alleged violator or violators.

The complaint shall specify the provision or provisions of this part or regulation or order alleged to be violated or about to be violated and the facts alleged to constitute a violation thereof, may order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order, and shall inform the violators of the opportunity for a hearing before the board. Upon the request of the alleged violator or violators, the department shall promptly make available and provide access to any documents and other information that address the factual and scientific basis of the complaint.

Any such order shall become final and not subject to review unless the person or persons named in the order request by written petition a hearing before the board, as provided in § 69-3-110, no later than thirty (30) days after the date such order is served; provided, that the board may review such final order on the same grounds upon which a court of the state may review default judgments.

Whenever the commissioner, with the concurrence of the governor, finds that an emergency exists imperatively requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, or the health of animals, fish, or aquatic life, or a public water supply, or recreational, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other reasonable uses, the commissioner may, without prior notice, issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken as the commissioner deems necessary to meet the emergency.

If the violator fails to respond or is unable to respond to the commissioner's order, the commissioner may take such emergency action as the commissioner deems necessary, or contract with a qualified person or persons to carry out the emergency measures. The commissioner may assess the person or persons responsible for the emergency condition for actual costs incurred by the commissioner in meeting the emergency.

Furthermore, the commissioner is empowered to establish programs and procedures to qualify the state for emergency funding from the federal government.

Except as otherwise expressly provided, any notice, complaint, order, or other instrument issued by or under authority of this part may be served on any person affected thereby personally, by the commissioner or any person designated by the commissioner, or such service may be made in accordance with Tennessee statutes authorizing service of process in civil actions. Proof of service shall be filed in the office of the commissioner.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 8; 1971, ch. 386, § 3; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-331; Acts 2008, ch. 1056, § 1.

69-3-110. Hearings.

Any hearing brought before the board pursuant to § 69-3-105(i), § 69-3-109, § 69-3-115, § 69-3-116, or § 69-3-118 shall be conducted as a contested case. The hearing shall be heard before an administrative judge sitting alone pursuant to §§ 4-5-301(a)(2) and 4-5-314(b), unless settled by the parties. The administrative judge to whom the case has been assigned shall convene the parties for a scheduling conference within thirty (30) days of the date the petition is filed. The scheduling order for the contested case issued by the administrative judge shall establish a schedule that results in a hearing being completed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the scheduling conference, unless the parties agree to a longer time or the administrative judge allows otherwise for good cause shown, and an initial order being issued within sixty (60) days of completion of the record of the hearing. The administrative judge's initial order, together with any earlier orders issued by the administrative judge, shall become final unless appealed to the board by the commissioner or other party within thirty (30) days of entry of the initial order or, unless the board passes a motion to review the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-315, within the longer of thirty (30) days or seven (7) days after the first board meeting to occur after entry of the initial order. Upon appeal to the board by a party, or upon passage of a motion of the board to review the administrative judge's initial order, the board shall afford each party an opportunity to present briefs, shall review the record and allow each party an opportunity to present oral argument. If appealed to the board, the review of the administrative judge's initial order shall be limited to the record, but shall be de novo with no presumption of correctness. In such appeals, the board shall thereafter render a final order, in accordance with § 4-5-314, affirming, modifying, remanding, or vacating the administrative judge's order. A final order rendered pursuant to this section is effective upon its entry, except as provided in § 4-5-320(b) unless a later effective date is stated therein. A petition to stay the effective date of a final order may be filed under § 4-5-316. A petition for reconsideration of a final order may be filed pursuant to § 4-5-317. Judicial review of a final order may be sought by filing a petition for review in accordance with § 4-5-322. An order of an administrative judge that becomes final in the absence of an appeal or review by the board shall be deemed to be a decision of the board in that case for purposes of the standard of review by a court; however, in other matters before the board, it may be considered but shall not be binding on the board.

In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a notice of hearing or subpoena issued under this section, the chancery court of Davidson County, or the chancery court of the county in which the hearing is conducted, shall have jurisdiction upon application of the board or commissioner to issue an order requiring such person to appear and testify or produce evidence as the case may require, and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as contempt.

The decision of the board shall become final and binding on all parties unless appealed to the courts as provided in § 69-3-111.

Any person to whom an emergency order is directed pursuant to § 69-3-109(b) shall comply immediately, but on petition to the board shall be afforded a hearing as soon as possible, but in no case shall such hearing be held later than three (3) days from the receipt of such petition by the board.

Any hearing required by this section or chapter shall be conducted in accordance with § 13-18-114 when the hearing involves a major energy project, as defined by § 13-18-102.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 9; 1971, ch. 386, § 4; 1973, ch. 98, § 5; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1981, ch. 131, § 44; T.C.A., § 70-332; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 7; 2007, ch. 362, § 37; 2013, ch. 181, §§ 15, 16; 2014, ch. 624, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with, however when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a) and deleted subsection (c), shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

69-3-111. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from any final order or other final determination of the board by any party, with the exception of the department. An appeal from a final order or other final determination of the board is instituted by filing a petition for review in the chancery court of Davidson County, or in the chancery court of the county in which the violation of this chapter occurred. The alleged violator shall elect in which court to file the petition for review.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 10; 1971, ch. 386, § 5; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A., § 70-333; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 8; 1993, ch. 156, § 1; 2013, ch. 181, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 156, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act applied to all petitions for review filed on or after July 1, 1993.

Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 19 provided that for the purpose of construing the act in relation to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the act shall be deemed to be procedural in nature. It is the intent of the general assembly that Acts 2013, chapter 181 and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act shall be complied with, however when in conflict, the provisions of Acts 2013, chapter 181 shall govern.

Acts 2013, ch. 181, § 20 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all cases filed on or after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Permissive appeals to supreme court, T.R.A.P. 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 191.

69-3-112. Assistance in prosecuting violations.

It is the duty of the district attorneys general in the various districts throughout the state or the attorney general and reporter to assist the department, upon its request, by prosecuting those persons in violation of §§69-3-115 —69-3-117.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 11; 1971, ch. 386, § 6; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1979, ch. 422, § 20; T.C.A., § 70-334.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

69-3-113. Procurement of information.

Any person whom the board or the commissioner has reason to believe is causing, or may be about to cause, pollution, or any person having information concerning such person, shall furnish the board or the commissioner, upon request by the board or commission, all pertinent information required by the board or the commissioner in the discharge of the board's or commissioner's duties under this part.

Under this section, information includes data relating to processes or methods of manufacture or production required by the board, the commissioner, or officers of the United States in the administration of their duties, including secret formulae and proprietary manufacturing processes.

All information shall be used by the board only for purposes of water quality control. The board or the commissioner has the power to issue protection orders to prevent public dissemination of any secret formulae or proprietary manufacturing processes, except that such orders shall not extend to information concerning waste products discharged into the waters of the state.

In addition to providing information, persons may be required to keep such records as deemed necessary by the board or the commissioner to facilitate the discharge of their duties.

Any information obtained by the board or commissioner, except secret formulae or proprietary manufacturing processes, pursuant to this section, shall be available to the public for reasonable inspection and copying.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 12; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-335.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

69-3-114. Causing pollution or refusing to furnish information.

It is unlawful for any person to discharge any substance into the waters of the state or to place or cause any substance to be placed in any location where such substances, either by themselves or in combination with others, cause any of the damages as defined in § 69-3-103, unless such discharge shall be due to an unavoidable accident or unless such action has been properly authorized. Any such action is declared to be a public nuisance.

In addition, it is unlawful for any person to act in a manner or degree that is violative of any provision of this part or of any rule, regulation, or standard of water quality promulgated by the board or of any permits or orders issued pursuant to this part; or to fail or refuse to file an application for a permit as required in § 69-3-108; or to refuse to furnish, or to falsify any records, information, plans, specifications, or other data required by the board or the commissioner under this part.

The plea of financial inability to prevent, abate, or control pollution shall not be a valid defense under this part.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 13; 1972, ch. 631, § 2; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-336.

Cross-References. Abatement of nuisances, title 29, ch. 3.

Penalties for violations of title 69, ch. 3, part 1, §69-3-115.